art-pron/pron.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Pronouns
! Author: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013

! These pronouns can be found in Caduff&Caprez 161, 
! Personal pronouns: 163, 165, 166, 169, 172
! Reflexive pronouns: 179, 180
! Possessive pronouns: 184, 185, 187
! Demonstrative pronouns: 189 - 195
! Interrogative pronouns: 199 - 206, 
! Indefinite pronouns: 207

Multichar_Symbols +Pron +Pers +Refl +Poss +Dem +Interrog +Indef 
^DB +Noun
+Nom +AccDat +Acc 
+Masc +Fem +MF 
+1P +2P +3P +Sg +Pl 
+Apo +Ton +Aton 
@U.FLEX.MSg@ @U.FLEX.FSg@ @U.FLEX.MPl@ @U.FLEX.FPl@

LEXICON Root
PERSONAL ;
REFLEXIVE ;
POSSESSIVE ;
DEMONSTRATIVE ;
INTERROGATIVE ;
INDEFINITE ;

LEXICON PERSONAL
! jau
jau+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Sg:jau	#;
jau+Pron+Pers+Acc+Ton+1P+MF+Sg:mai	#;
jau+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+1P+MF+Sg:ma	#;
jau+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+1P+MF+Sg+Apo:m'	#;
! ti
ti+Pron+Pers+Nom+2P+MF+Sg:ti	#;
ti+Pron+Pers+Acc+Ton+2P+MF+Sg:tai	#;
ti+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+2P+MF+Sg:ta	#;
ti+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+2P+MF+Sg+Apo:t'	#;
! el
el+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Masc+Sg:el	#;
el+Pron+Pers+Acc+Ton+3P+Masc+Sg:el	#;
el+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+3P+Masc+Sg:al	#;
! ella
ella+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Fem+Sg:ella	#;
ella+Pron+Pers+Acc+Ton+3P+Fem+Sg:ella	#;
ella+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+3P+Fem+Sg:la	#;
ella+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+3P+Fem+Sg+Apo:l'	#;
! i
i+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Sg:i	#;
i+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Sg+Apo:igl	#;
! nus
nus+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Pl:nus	#;
nus+Pron+Pers+Acc+Ton+1P+MF+Pl:nus	#;
nus+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+1P+MF+Pl:ans	#;
! vus
vus+Pron+Pers+Nom+2P+MF+Pl:vus	#;
vus+Pron+Pers+Acc+Ton+2P+MF+Pl:vus	#;
vus+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+2P+MF+Pl:as	#;
! Vus (courtesy)
Vus+Pron+Pers+Nom+2P+MF+Pl:Vus	#;
Vus+Pron+Pers+Acc+Ton+2P+MF+Pl:Vus	#;
Vus+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+2P+MF+Pl:As	#;
! els
els+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Masc+Pl:els	#;
els+Pron+Pers+Acc+Ton+3P+Masc+Pl:els	#;
els+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+3P+Masc+Pl:als	#;
! ellas
ellas+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Fem+Pl:ellas	#;
ellas+Pron+Pers+Acc+Ton+3P+Fem+Pl:ellas	#;
ellas+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+3P+Fem+Pl:las	#;
! i
i+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Pl:i	#;



LEXICON REFLEXIVE
! jau
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+1P+MF+Sg:mai	#;
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+1P+MF+Sg:ma	#;
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+1P+MF+Sg+Apo:m'	#;
! ti
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+2P+MF+Sg:tai	#;
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+2P+MF+Sg:ta	#;
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+2P+MF+Sg+Apo:t'	#;
! el, ella
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+3P+MF+Sg:sai	#;
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+3P+MF+Sg:sa	#;
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+3P+MF+Sg+Apo:s'	#;
! nus
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+1P+MF+Pl:nus	#;
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+1P+MF+Pl:ans	#;
! vus
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+2P+MF+Pl:vus	#;
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+2P+MF+Pl:as	#;
! Vus
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+2P+MF+Pl:Vus	#;
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+2P+MF+Pl:As	#;
! els, ellas
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+3P+MF+Pl:sai	#;
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+3P+MF+Pl:sa	#;
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+3P+MF+Pl+Apo:s'	#;
! jau
sasez+Pron+Refl+Acc+1P+Masc+Sg:mamez	#;
sasez+Pron+Refl+Acc+1P+Fem+Sg:mamezza	#;
! ti
sasez+Pron+Refl+Acc+2P+Masc+Sg:tatez	#;
sasez+Pron+Refl+Acc+2P+Fem+Sg:tatezza	#;
! el, ella
sasez+Pron+Refl+Acc+3P+Masc+Sg:sasez	#;
sasez+Pron+Refl+Acc+3P+Fem+Sg:sasezza	#;
! els, ellas
sasez+Pron+Refl+Acc+3P+Masc+Pl:sasezs	#;
sasez+Pron+Refl+Acc+3P+Fem+Pl:sasezzas	#;



LEXICON POSSESSIVE
! jau
mes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:mes	#;
mes+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Sg:mieu	#;
mes+Pron+Poss:mes@U.FLEX.MPl@	PossEnd;
mes+Pron+Poss:mia@U.FLEX.FSg@	PossEnd;
mes+Pron+Poss:mias@U.FLEX.FPl@	PossEnd;
! ti
tes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:tes	#;
tes+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Sg:tieu	#;
tes+Pron+Poss:tes@U.FLEX.MPl@	PossEnd;
tes+Pron+Poss:tia@U.FLEX.FSg@	PossEnd;
tes+Pron+Poss:tias@U.FLEX.FPl@	PossEnd;
! el, ella
ses+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:ses	#;
ses+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Sg:sieu	#;
ses+Pron+Poss:ses@U.FLEX.MPl@	PossEnd;
ses+Pron+Poss:sia@U.FLEX.FSg@	PossEnd;
ses+Pron+Poss+Fem+Sg+Apo:si'@U.FLEX.FSg@	#;
ses+Pron+Poss:sias@U.FLEX.FPl@	PossEnd;
! nus
noss+Pron+Poss:noss@U.FLEX.MSg@	PossEnd;
noss+Pron+Poss:noss@U.FLEX.MPl@	PossEnd;
noss+Pron+Poss:nossa@U.FLEX.FSg@	PossEnd;
noss+Pron+Poss:nossas@U.FLEX.FPl@	PossEnd;
! vus
voss+Pron+Poss:voss@U.FLEX.MSg@	PossEnd;
voss+Pron+Poss:voss@U.FLEX.MPl@	PossEnd;
voss+Pron+Poss:vossa@U.FLEX.FSg@	PossEnd;
voss+Pron+Poss:vossas@U.FLEX.FPl@	PossEnd;
! Vus
Voss+Pron+Poss:Voss@U.FLEX.MSg@	PossEnd;
Voss+Pron+Poss:Voss@U.FLEX.MPl@	PossEnd;
Voss+Pron+Poss:Vossa@U.FLEX.FSg@	PossEnd;
Voss+Pron+Poss:Vossas@U.FLEX.FPl@	PossEnd;
! els, ellas
lur+Pron+Poss:lur	PossEnd;



LEXICON DEMONSTRATIVE
gliez+Pron+Dem:gliez	#;
quai+Pron+Dem:quai	#;
quest+Pron+Dem:quest	REGULAR;
tal+Pron+Dem:tal	REGULAR;
tschai+Pron+Dem:tschai	#;
!!
! lez
lez+Pron+Dem+Masc+Sg:lez	#;
lez+Pron+Dem+Masc+Pl:lezs	#;
lez+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg:lezza	#;
lez+Pron+Dem+Fem+Pl:lezzas	#;
! quel
quel+Pron+Dem+Masc+Sg:quel	#;
quel+Pron+Dem+Masc+Pl:quels	#;
quel+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg:quella	#;
quel+Pron+Dem+Fem+Pl:quellas	#;
! sez
sez+Pron+Dem+Masc+Sg:sez	#;
sez+Pron+Dem+Masc+Pl:sezs	#;
sez+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg:sezza	#;
sez+Pron+Dem+Fem+Pl:sezzas	#;
! tschel
tschel+Pron+Dem+Masc+Sg:tschel	#;
tschel+Pron+Dem+Masc+Pl:tschels	#;
tschel+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg:tschella	#;
tschel+Pron+Dem+Fem+Pl:tschellas	#;



LEXICON INTERROGATIVE
qual+Pron+Interrog:qual	REGULAR;
quant+Pron+Interrog:quant	REGULAR;
tge+Pron+Interrog:tge	#;
tgenin+Pron+Interrog:tgenin	REGULAR;
tgi+Pron+Interrog:tgi	#;



LEXICON INDEFINITE
finadin+Pron+Indef:finadin	REGULARSINGULAR;
i+Pron+Indef:i	#;
in+Pron+Indef:in	REGULARSINGULAR;
inqual+Pron+Indef:inqual	REGULAR;
ins+Pron+Indef:ins	#;
insaqual+Pron+Indef:insaqual	REGULAR;
insaquants+Pron+Indef:insaquant	REGULARPLURAL;
insatge+Pron+Indef:insatge	#;
insatgi+Pron+Indef:insatgi	#;
intgins+Pron+Indef:intgin	REGULARPLURAL;
mintga+Pron+Indef:mintga	#;
mintga+Pron+Indef+Apo:mintg'	#;
mintgin+Pron+Indef:mintgin	REGULARSINGULAR;
nagin+Pron+Indef:nagin	REGULAR;
plirs+Pron+Indef:plir	REGULARPLURAL;
scadin+Pron+Indef:scadin	REGULARSINGULAR;
tant+Pron+Indef:tant	REGULAR;
tschert+Pron+Indef:tschert	REGULAR;
tschertin+Pron+Indef:tschertin	REGULARPLURAL;
varsaquants+Pron+Indef:varsaquant	REGULARPLURAL;
!!
! tut
tut+Pron+Indef+Masc+Sg:tut	#;
tut+Pron+Indef+Masc+Pl:tuts	#;
tut+Pron+Indef+Fem+Sg:tutta	#;
tut+Pron+Indef+Fem+Pl:tuttas	#;

! omadu
omadus+Pron+Indef+Masc+Pl:omadus	#;
omadus+Pron+Indef+Fem+Pl:omaduas	#;


!! Endings:
LEXICON REGULAR
+Masc+Sg:0	#;
+Masc+Pl:s	#;
+Fem+Sg:a	#;
+Fem+Pl:as	#;

LEXICON REGULARSINGULAR
+Masc+Sg:0	#;
+Fem+Sg:a	#;

LEXICON REGULARPLURAL
+Masc+Pl:s	#;
+Fem+Pl:as	#;

! Endings for Possessive Pronouns
LEXICON PossEnd
+Masc+Sg:@U.FLEX.MSg@	#;
^DB+Noun+Masc+Sg:@U.FLEX.MSg@	#;
+Fem+Sg:@U.FLEX.FSg@	#;
^DB+Noun+Fem+Sg:@U.FLEX.FSg@	#;
+Masc+Pl:@U.FLEX.MPl@	#;
^DB+Noun+Masc+Pl:@U.FLEX.MPl@	#;
+Fem+Pl:@U.FLEX.FPl@	#;
^DB+Noun+Fem+Pl:@U.FLEX.FPl@	#;
